Nebraska, session 109, LB833.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB833 LB833
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 85-308.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
85-308.01 The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges shall
have power to confer, upon completion of a four-year course in liberal
arts program prescribed by such board, a degree of bachelor of arts or
bachelor of science.
Sec. 2. Section 85-941, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-941 The University of Nebraska shall have sole responsibility for
all graduate programs at the specialist and master's degree level and all
baccalaureate professional programs throughout the public sector of
postsecondary education in Nebraska, with the exception of programs in
education and other areas authorized by the Legislature at the state
colleges. The University of Nebraska shall have primary responsibility
for instruction in agriculture and natural resources and primary
statewide responsibility for research and public service in agriculture
and natural resources. All baccalaureate and baccalaureate transfer
programs in agriculture and natural resources initiated after July 1,
1978, at state colleges and community colleges shall be conducted in
cooperation with the University of Nebraska.
Sec. 3. Section 85-951, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-951 The state colleges, collectively and individually, shall have
as their first instructional priority the provision of baccalaureate
general academic, baccalaureate occupational, and baccalaureate
professional degree programs in education. The colleges' second
instructional priority shall be master's and doctoral programs in
education and other areas authorized by the Coordinating Commission for
Postsecondary Education pursuant to sections 85-1413 and 85-1414. Such
colleges' third priority shall be the continuation and development of
applied research and public service activities. The colleges' fourth
-2-

LB833 LB833
2026 2026
priority shall be the awarding of the specialist degree in education.
Sec. 4. Section 85-956, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-956 Chadron State College may maintain its existing baccalaureate
general academic, baccalaureate occupational, and baccalaureate
professional degree programs and shall prioritize limit new baccalaureate
degree programs based on the needs of rural Nebraska and to the needs of
its unique service area generally defined as the state's western region.
Subject to approval by the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State
Colleges, Chadron State College may independently award the master's
degree in business administration. Subject to approval by the Board of
Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, Chadron State College may offer
doctoral degrees in education and other master's degree programs upon
demonstration of a compelling need in disciplines in which it has a
demonstrated capacity as authorized and approved by the Coordinating
Commission for Postsecondary Education pursuant to sections 85-1413 and
85-1414.
Sec. 5. Section 85-957, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-957 Peru State College may maintain its existing baccalaureate
general academic, baccalaureate occupational, and baccalaureate
professional degree programs and shall prioritize the development of
limit new baccalaureate degree programs based on the needs of rural
Nebraska and to the needs of its unique service area generally defined as
the state's southeast region. Subject to approval by the Board of
Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, Peru State College may offer
doctoral degrees in education and other master's degree programs upon
demonstration of a compelling need in disciplines in which it has a
demonstrated capacity as authorized and approved by the Coordinating
Commission for Postsecondary Education pursuant to sections 85-1413 and
85-1414.
-3-

LB833 LB833
2026 2026
Sec. 6. Section 85-958, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-958 Wayne State College may maintain its existing baccalaureate
general academic, baccalaureate occupational, and baccalaureate
professional degree programs and shall prioritize the development of
limit new baccalaureate degree programs based on the needs of rural
Nebraska and to the needs of its unique service area generally defined as
the state's northeast region. Subject to approval by the Board of
Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, Wayne State College may
independently award the master's degree in business administration.
Subject to approval by the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State
Colleges, Wayne State College may offer doctoral degrees in education and
other master's degree programs upon demonstration of a compelling need in
disciplines in which it has a demonstrated capacity as authorized and
approved by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education
pursuant to sections 85-1413 and 85-1414.
Sec. 7. Original sections 85-308.01, 85-941, 85-951, 85-956,
85-957, and 85-958, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-4-